Maryland, session 2025, SB0812.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
29–109.
(c) The Board of Trustees shall grant an accidental disability retirement
allowance to a member of the Law Enforcement Officers’ Pension System if:
(1) the member is totally and permanently incapacitated for duty arising
out of or in the course of the actual performance of duty without willful negligence by the
member; and
(2) the medical board certifies that:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0812*

SENATE BILL 812
(i) 1. the member is totally incapacitated, either mentally or
physically, for the further performance of duty; OR
2. THE MEMBER IS DISABLED, AS DEFINED UNDER §
72(M)(7) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE;
(ii) the incapacity is likely to be permanent; and
(iii) the member should be retired.
29–110.
(a) This section does not apply to the State Police Retirement System.
(b) Except as provided in [subsection (c)] SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (E) of this
section, an accidental disability retirement allowance equals the lesser of:
(1) the member’s average final compensation; or
(2) the sum of:
(i) an annuity that is the actuarial equivalent of the member’s
accumulated contributions at retirement; and
(ii) a pension equal to two–thirds of the member’s average final
compensation.
(c) (1) This subsection applies to a member of a State system other than the
Law Enforcement Officers’ Pension System who is at least normal retirement age.
(2) An accidental disability retirement allowance equals the greater of:
(i) a normal service retirement allowance; or
(ii) an accidental disability retirement allowance computed in
accordance with subsection (b) of this section.
(d) (1) This subsection applies only to a member of the Employees’ Pension
System who:
(i) is promoted within the Department of Corrections to a position
that no longer is eligible for membership in the Correctional Officers’ Retirement System
as provided in § 25–201 of this article;

SENATE BILL 812 3
(ii) elects not to transfer the years of creditable service the individual
accrued in the Correctional Officers’ Retirement System to the Employees’ Pension System;
and
(iii) is eligible to receive a vested allowance from the Correctional
Officers’ Retirement System.
(2) A member may receive an accidental disability retirement allowance
under this section if the member:
(i) does not elect to receive a vested allowance from the Correctional
Officers’ Retirement System; and
(ii) transfers the member’s accumulated contributions in the
Correctional Officers’ Retirement System to the Employees’ Pension System.
(E) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A MEMBER OF THE LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS’ PENSION SYSTEM.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO A MEMBER WHO THE MEDICAL
BOARD CERTIFIES IS DISABLED, AS DEFINED UNDER § 72(M)(7) OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE, UNDER § 29–109(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) AN ACCIDENTAL DISABILITY RETIREMENT ALLOWANCE FOR AN
INDIVIDUAL CERTIFIED AS DISABLED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION
EQUALS THE SUM OF:
(I) AN ANNUITY THAT IS THE ACTUARIAL EQUIVALENT OF THE
MEMBER’S ACCUMULATED CONTRIBUTIONS AT RETIREMENT; AND
(II) A PENSION EQUAL TO 100% OF THE MEMBER’S AVERAGE
FINAL COMPENSATION.
(4) IF A BENEFIT IS PAID TO AN INDIVIDUAL UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, A BENEFIT UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE PAID
TO THE INDIVIDUAL.
29–111.
(a) This section applies to the State Police Retirement System.
(b) Except as provided in § 24–401.1(k) of this article, the Board of Trustees shall
grant a special disability retirement allowance to a member if:

SENATE BILL 812
(1) the member is totally and permanently incapacitated for duty arising
out of or in the course of the actual performance of duty without willful negligence by the
member; and
(2) the medical board certifies that:
(i) 1. the member is totally incapacitated, either mentally or
physically, for the further performance of duty; OR
2. THE MEMBER IS DISABLED, AS DEFINED UNDER §
72(M)(7) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE;
(ii) the incapacity is likely to be permanent; and
(iii) the member should be retired.
(c) Except as provided in [subsection (d)] SUBSECTIONS (D) AND (E) of this
section, a special disability retirement allowance equals the lesser of:
(1) the member’s average final compensation; or
(2) the sum of:
(i) an annuity that is the actuarial equivalent of the member’s
accumulated contributions at retirement; and
(ii) a pension equal to two–thirds of the member’s average final
compensation.
(d) (1) This subsection applies to a member who is at least normal retirement
age.
(2) A special disability retirement allowance equals the greater of:
(i) a normal service retirement allowance; or
(ii) a special disability retirement allowance computed in accordance
with subsection (c) of this section.
(E) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO A MEMBER WHO THE MEDICAL
BOARD CERTIFIES IS DISABLED, AS DEFINED UNDER § 72(M)(7) OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE, UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) A SPECIAL DISABILITY RETIREMENT ALLOWANCE FOR AN
INDIVIDUAL CERTIFIED AS DISABLED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
EQUALS THE SUM OF:

SENATE BILL 812 5
(I) AN ANNUITY THAT IS THE ACTUARIAL EQUIVALENT OF THE
MEMBER’S ACCUMULATED CONTRIBUTIONS AT RETIREMENT; AND
(II) A PENSION EQUAL TO 100% OF THE MEMBER’S AVERAGE
FINAL COMPENSATION.
(3) IF A BENEFIT IS PAID TO AN INDIVIDUAL UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, A BENEFIT UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OR (D) OF THIS SECTION MAY NOT
BE PAID TO THE INDIVIDUAL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.